Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 441.020 is amended to read:
441.020. (1) Licenses for health care facilities, except long term care facilities as defined in ORS
442.015, must be obtained from the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Licenses for long term care  facilities must be obtained from the Department of Human Ser-
vices.
(3) Applications shall be upon such forms and shall contain such information as  the authority
or the department may reasonably require, which may include  affirmative evidence of ability to
comply with such reasonable standards and rules as may lawfully be  prescribed under ORS 441.025.
(4)(a) Each application submitted to the Oregon Health Authority must be accompanied by the
license fee. If the license  is denied, the fee shall be refunded to the applicant. If the license is issued,
the fee shall be paid into the State Treasury to the  credit of the Oregon Health Authority Fund for
the purpose of carrying out the functions of the Oregon Health  Authority under and enforcing ORS
441.015 to 441.119, 441.761 to 441.795 and 441.993; or
(b) Each application submitted to the Department of  Human Services must be accompanied by
the application fee or the annual renewal fee, as applicable. If the license is denied, the  fee shall
be refunded to the applicant. If the license is issued, the fee shall be paid into the  State Treasury
to the credit of the  Department of Human Services Account for the purpose of carrying out the
functions of the Department of Human Services under and enforcing ORS 431A.050  to 431A.080,
441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8) of this section, for hospitals with:
[(a) Fewer than 26 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,250. ]
[(b) Twenty-six beds or more but fewer than 50 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,850. ]
[(c) Fifty or more beds but fewer than 100 beds, the annual license fee shall be $3,800. ]
[(d) One hundred beds or more but fewer than 200 beds, the annual license fee shall be $6,525. ]
[(e) Two hundred or more beds, but fewer than 500 beds, the annual license fee shall be $8,500. ]
[(f) Five hundred or more beds, the annual license fee shall be $12,070. ]
[(6) A hospital shall pay an annual fee of $750 for each hospital satellite indorsed  under the
hospital’s license.]
(a) Fewer than 26 beds, the annual license fee shall be $5,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 842 (SB 842-A) Page 1
(b) Twenty-six beds or more  but fewer than 50 beds, the annual license fee shall be $7,400.
(c) Fifty or more beds but fewer than 100 beds, the annual license fee shall be $13,800.
(d) One hundred beds or more  but fewer than 200 beds, the annual license fee shall be
$26,100.
(e) Two hundred or more beds, but fewer  than 500 beds, the annual license fee shall be
$34,000.
(f) Five hundred or more beds, the annual license fee shall be $48,280.
(6) A hospital shall pay an  annual fee of $3,000 for each hospital satellite indorsed under
the hospital’s license.
(7) The authority may charge a reduced hospital fee or hospital satellite fee if  the authority
determines that charging the standard fee constitutes a significant financial burden to the facility.
(8) For long term care facilities with:
(a) One to 15  beds, the application fee shall be $2,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be $1,000.
(b) Sixteen to 49 beds, the application fee shall be $3,000  and the annual renewal fee shall be
$1,500.
(c) Fifty to  99 beds, the application fee shall be $4,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be
$2,000.
(d) One hundred to 150 beds, the application fee shall  be $5,000 and the annual renewal fee shall
be $2,500.
(e) More than 150 beds, the application  fee shall be $6,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be
$3,000.
(9) For ambulatory surgical centers, the annual license fee shall be:
(a) $1,750 for certified and  high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers with more
than two procedure rooms.
(b) $1,250 for certified and high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical  centers with no
more than two procedure rooms.
(c) $1,000 for moderate complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers.
(10) For birthing centers, the annual license fee shall be $750.
(11) For outpatient renal dialysis facilities, the annual license fee shall be $2,000.
(12) The authority shall prescribe by rule the fee for licensing an extended stay center, not to
exceed:
(a) An application fee of $25,000; and
(b) An annual renewal fee of $5,000.
(13) The authority may assess a late fee not to exceed $1,250 for a hospital that fails to
pay a renewal license fee required under this section. The late fee shall be added to the re-
quired renewal license fee and must be paid by the health care facility before the  authority
may renew the license.
[(13)] (14) During the time the licenses remain in force, holders are not required to  pay in-
spection fees to any county, city or other municipality.
[(14)] (15) Any health care facility license may  be indorsed to permit operation at more than one
location.  If so, the applicable license fee shall be the sum of the license fees that would be applicable
if each location were separately licensed.  The authority may include hospital satellites on a
hospital’s license in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
[(15)] (16) Licenses for health maintenance organizations shall be obtained from the Director  of
the Department of Consumer and Business Services pursuant to ORS 731.072.
[(16)] (17) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this  section, all moneys received for approved ap-
plications  pursuant  to subsection (8) of this section shall be deposited in the Quality Care Fund es-
tablished in ORS 443.001.
[(17)] (18) As used in this section:
(a) “Hospital satellite” has the meaning prescribed by the authority by rule.
(b) “Procedure room” means a room where surgery or invasive procedures are performed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 842 (SB 842-A) Page 2
SECTION 2.  ORS 441.020, as amended by section 42, chapter 32, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
441.020. (1) Licenses for health care facilities, except long term care facilities as defined in ORS
442.015, must be obtained from the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Licenses for long term care facilities must be obtained from  the Department of Human Ser-
vices.
(3) Applications shall  be upon such forms and shall contain such information as the authority
or the department may reasonably require,  which may include affirmative evidence of ability to
comply with such reasonable standards and rules as may lawfully be  prescribed under ORS 441.025.
(4)(a) Each application submitted to the Oregon Health Authority must be accompanied by the
license fee. If the license  is denied, the fee shall be refunded to the applicant. If the license is issued,
the fee shall be paid into the State Treasury to the  credit of the Oregon Health Authority Fund for
the purpose of carrying out the functions of the Oregon Health  Authority under and enforcing ORS
441.015 to 441.119, 441.761 to 441.795 and 441.993; or
(b) Each application submitted to the Department  of Human Services must be accompanied by
the application fee  or the annual renewal fee, as applicable. If the license is denied, the fee shall
be refunded to  the applicant. If the license is issued, the fee shall be paid into the State Treasury
to the credit of the Department of Human Services Account for the purpose  of carrying out the
functions of the Department  of Human Services under and enforcing ORS 441.015 to 441.119 and
441.993.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8) of this section, for hospitals with:
[(a) Fewer than 26 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,250. ]
[(b) Twenty-six beds or more but fewer than 50 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,850. ]
[(c) Fifty or more beds but fewer than 100 beds, the annual license fee shall be $3,800. ]
[(d) One hundred beds or more but fewer than 200 beds, the annual license fee shall be $6,525. ]
[(e) Two hundred or more beds, but fewer than 500 beds, the annual license fee shall be $8,500. ]
[(f) Five hundred or more beds, the annual license fee shall be $12,070. ]
[(6) A hospital  shall pay an annual fee of $750 for each hospital satellite indorsed under the
hospital’s license.]
(a) Fewer than 26 beds, the annual license fee shall be $5,000.
(b) Twenty-six beds or more  but fewer than 50 beds, the annual license fee shall be $7,400.
(c) Fifty or more beds but fewer than 100 beds, the annual license fee shall be $13,800.
(d) One hundred beds or more  but fewer than 200 beds, the annual license fee shall be
$26,100.
(e) Two hundred or more beds, but fewer  than 500 beds, the annual license fee shall be
$34,000.
(f) Five hundred or more beds, the annual license fee shall be $48,280.
(6) A hospital shall pay an  annual fee of $3,000 for each hospital satellite indorsed under
the hospital’s license.
(7) The authority may charge a reduced hospital fee or hospital satellite fee if  the authority
determines that charging the standard fee constitutes a significant financial burden to the facility.
(8) For long term care facilities with:
(a) One to 15  beds, the application fee shall be $2,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be $1,000.
(b) Sixteen to 49 beds, the application fee shall be $3,000  and the annual renewal fee shall be
$1,500.
(c) Fifty to  99 beds, the application fee shall be $4,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be
$2,000.
(d) One hundred to 150 beds, the application fee shall  be $5,000 and the annual renewal fee shall
be $2,500.
(e) More than 150 beds, the application  fee shall be $6,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be
$3,000.
(9) For ambulatory surgical centers, the annual license fee shall be:
Enrolled Senate Bill 842 (SB 842-A) Page 3
(a) $1,750 for certified and  high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers with more
than two procedure rooms.
(b) $1,250 for certified and high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical  centers with no
more than two procedure rooms.
(c) $1,000 for moderate complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers.
(10) For birthing centers, the annual license fee shall be $750.
(11) For outpatient renal dialysis facilities, the annual license fee shall be $2,000.
(12) The authority shall prescribe by rule the fee for licensing an extended stay center, not to
exceed:
(a) An application fee of $25,000; and
(b) An annual renewal fee of $5,000.
(13) The authority may assess a late fee not to exceed $1,250 for a hospital that fails to
pay a renewal license fee required under this section. The late fee shall be added to the re-
quired renewal license fee and must be paid by the health care facility before the  authority
may renew the license.
[(13)] (14) During the time the licenses remain in force, holders are not required to  pay in-
spection fees to any county, city or other municipality.
[(14)] (15) Any health care facility license may  be indorsed to permit operation at more than one
location.  If so, the applicable license fee shall be the sum of the license fees that would be applicable
if each location were separately licensed.  The authority may include hospital satellites on a
hospital’s license in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
[(15)] (16) Licenses for health maintenance organizations shall be obtained from the Director  of
the Department of Consumer and Business Services pursuant to ORS 731.072.
[(16)] (17) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this  section, all moneys received for approved ap-
plications  pursuant  to subsection (8) of this section shall be deposited in the Quality Care Fund es-
tablished in ORS 443.001.
[(17)] (18) As used in this section:
(a) “Hospital satellite” has the meaning prescribed by the authority by rule.
(b) “Procedure room” means a room where surgery or invasive procedures are performed.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 441.044 is amended to read:
441.044. (1) Rules adopted pursuant to ORS 441.025  shall include procedures for the filing of
complaints as to the standard of care in any health care facility and provide for the confidentiality
of the identity of any complainant.
(2) A health care facility, or  person acting in the interest of the facility, may not take any dis-
ciplinary or other adverse action against any employee who in good  faith brings evidence of inap-
propriate care or any other violation of law or rules to the attention of the proper  authority solely
because of the employee’s action as described in this subsection.
(3) Any employee who has knowledge of  inappropriate care or any other violation of law or
rules shall utilize established reporting procedures  of the health care facility administration before
notifying the Department of Human Services, Oregon Health  Authority or other state agency of the
alleged violation, unless the employee believes that  patient health or safety is in immediate jeopardy
or the  employee makes the report to the department or the authority under the confidentiality pro-
visions of subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The protection of health care facility employees under subsection (2) of this section shall
commence with the reporting of the alleged violation by the employee to the administration  of the
health care facility or to the  department, authority or other state agency pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section.
(5) Any person suffering loss or damage due to any violation of  subsection (2) of this section has
a right of action for damages in addition to other appropriate remedy.
[(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to  a nursing staff, as defined in ORS 441.179, who
claims to be aggrieved by a violation of ORS 441.181 committed by a hospital. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 842 (SB 842-A) Page 4
[(7)] (6) Information  obtained by the department or the authority during an intake, triage or
investigation of a complaint or  reported violation under this section is confidential and not subject
to public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to  192.478. Upon the conclusion of the investigation, the
department or the  authority may publicly release a report of the department’s or the authority’s
findings but may  not include information in the report that could be used to identify the complainant
or any patient at the health  care facility. The department or the authority may use any information
obtained during an  investigation in an administrative or judicial proceeding concerning the licensing
of a health care facility, and may report information obtained during an investigation to a  health
professional regulatory board as defined in ORS 676.160, the Long Term Care Administrators  Board,
the Board of Licensed Dietitians or the Behavior Analysis Regulatory Board  as that information
pertains to a licensee of the board.
SECTION 4.  ORS 441.062 is amended to read:
441.062. (1) In conducting inspections for the purpose  of licensing health care facilities under
ORS 441.020, the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Human  Services shall avoid un-
necessary facility disruption  by coordinating inspections performed by the authority or the depart-
ment with inspections performed by other  federal, state and local agencies that have responsibility
for health care facility licensure.
(2) Whenever possible, the authority and the  department shall avoid duplication of inspections
by accepting inspection reports or surveys prepared by other state agencies that have responsibility
for health care facility licensure for purposes of the inspection required for licensure.
(3) In lieu of an in-person site inspection as required by ORS 441.025 and  441.060, the authority
or the department may accept a certification or accreditation from a federal agency  or an accred-
iting body approved by the authority or the department that the state  licensing standards have been
met, if:
(a) The certification or accreditation is recognized by the  authority or the department as ad-
dressing the standards and condition of participation requirements of the Centers for Medicare  and
Medicaid Services and other standards set by the authority or the department;
(b) The health care facility notifies  the authority or the department to participate in any exit
interview conducted by the federal agency or accrediting body; and
(c)(A) The health care facility provides copies  of summary documentation from the fed-
eral agency or accrediting body concerning the certification or  accreditation to the authority
within 30 days following the receipt of summary  documentation from the federal agency or
accrediting body; or
(B) The health care facility provides copies of  all documentation concerning the certification
or accreditation requested by [ the authority or ] the department.
(4) The authority and the department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 5.
ORS 441.021 is repealed.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (5),  chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for Oregon State Hospital,
is increased by $63,860, for the payment of increased hospital licensing fees.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on October 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 842 (SB 842-A) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 842 (SB 842-A) Page 6